Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.500

Reentry.

(1) A member, who had left service and withdrawn the member's accumulated contributions, shall receive service credit for such prior service if the member restores all withdrawn accumulated contributions together with interest since the time of withdrawal as determined by the department.

The restoration of such funds must be completed within five years of the resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever occurs first.

(2) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (1) of this section, the member may receive service credit destroyed by the withdrawn contributions if the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) is paid.

[ 1998 c 341 s 111.]